North Dakota, session 69, HB1257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 54-03.1-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
54-03.1-02. Time and place of meeting - Who must attend.
1. In each even-numbered year on the first Monday in the month of December or on a
date selected by the legislative management but not earlier than December first nor
later than December fifteenth, all personsindividuals elected at the previous November
general election as members of the succeeding legislative session, and members
whose terms do not expire until the first day of December following the next November
general election, shall meet in the state capitol in the city of Bismarck, or at such other
place as may be designated, at a time designated by the legislative management for
the purpose of conducting an organizational session.
2. The legislative management shall call the organizational session and the legislative
council shall make such arrangements as may be necessary for operation of the
session.
3. The organizational session may be conducted over a period of up to five business
days.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 54-03.1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
Page No. 1 25.0775.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
54-03.1-03. Agenda - Adoption of rules.
The agenda of the organizational session must include the following:
1. Orientation classes upon legislative rules and procedure for new legislators; regarding:
a. Floor session and standing committee procedures, including adopted legislative
rules and common practices;
b. Appropriations committees procedures;
c. Use of tools, equipment, and technology relating to the legislative process; and
d. Constitutional law, statutes of limitations, due process, and other general legal
principles as arranged by legislative council ;
2. Presentation of reports by legislative interim committees or commissions;
3. Party caucuses to review proposed legislative rules and committee assignments, as
appropriate;
4. Appointment of procedural committees;
5. A joint session including:
a. Presentation of the budget and revenue proposals recommended by the
governor as provided in section 54-44.1-07; and
b. A report, as directed by legislative management, presented by each constitutional
officeholder; and
6. All other similar matters, in order that so the legislative assembly beis fully organized
and ready to begin its business by the first day of the regular session.
Page No. 2 25.0775.02000